Alabama, session 2026rs, HB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Main Street Revival Act.
Section 2. For purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Department of Economic and
Community Affairs.
(2) ELIGIBLE AREA. A commercial corridor or downtown
district in a municipality with a population under 25,000.
(3) ELIGIBLE PROPERTY. A vacant or underutilized
commercial structure, or structure that can be used for a
commercial purpose, located within an eligible area.
Section 3. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Main Street Microenterprise Grant Program to
provide small grants to local entrepreneurs launching or
expanding businesses in eligible areas.
(b) The department shall establish criteria for
eligibility in a manner that promotes revitalization and
encourages entrepeneurship.
(c) The grants shall range from five thousand dollars
Page 2

(c) The grants shall range from five thousand dollars
HB596 INTRODUCED
($5,000) to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and may be
used for leasehold improvements, equipment, signage, or
startup inventory.
(d) Applicants must demonstrate a business plan and
sufficient funding to match the amount of any grant awarded
pursuant to this section.
(e) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
Section 4. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Historic Storefront Preservation Incentive
Grant Program to support the preservation and modernization of
historic commercial buildings through state grants and
technical assistance.
(b) The department shall establish criteria for
eligibility of historic properties in eligible areas, provided
properties must have been constructed at least 50 years before
the date of grant application.
(c) Grants may be used for facade improvements,
structural stabilization, and upgrades to comply with the
Americans with Disabilities Act.
(d) The department shall give priority to projects
contributing to local heritage tourism or cultural
revitalization.
(e) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
Section 5. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
Page 3

funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
HB596 INTRODUCED
administer the Business Incubator and Pop-Up Support Grant
Program to support temporary retail activations, shared
commercial space, and business coaching for early-stage
ventures in eligible areas.
(b) Grants under this program shall be available to
nonprofit businesses and organizations, chambers of commerce,
and municipal development agencies.
(c) Grants may be used for shared retail spaces or
maker hubs, pop-up shops or kiosks in vacant storefronts, or
technical assistance and mentorship programs.
(d) The department may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this section.
Section 6. (a) Subject to the Legislature appropriating
funds for this purpose, the department shall establish and
administer the Local Planning and Zoning Modernization
100 Assistance Program to offer technical assistance and matching
101 grants for local governments to support mixed-use
102 redevelopment and small business growth.
103 (b) The department shall provide matching grants and
104 planning support to municipalities to update zoning and land
105 use regulation in a manner that creates mixed-use overlays;
106 reduces parking minimums; and streamlines permitting for
107 adaptive reuse.
108 Section 7. (a) An income tax credit is established for
109 eligible taxpayers who incur costs for the renovation of an
110 eligible property. The tax credit shall equal 25 percent of
111 the total cost of the renovation of the eligible property. The
112 total costs for purposes of the tax credit calculation under
Page 4

total costs for purposes of the tax credit calculation under
HB596 INTRODUCED
113 this subsection shall exclude any costs reimbursed or expected
114 to be reimbursed by any other entity including, but not
115 limited to, insurance reimbursements, grants, or other
116 government subsidies or incentives.
117 (b) The tax credit issued under this section may not
118 decrease a taxpayer's tax liability to less than zero. If the
119 tax liability of the taxpayer is less than the tax credit
120 issued under this section, the taxpayer may only use the
121 amount of the credit that reduces the taxpayer liability to
122 zero. The tax credit is not refundable nor transferable but
123 may be carried forward for a total of five years.
124 (c) The Department of Revenue may audit and reassess
125 any credit improperly obtained by the taxpayer, in accordance
126 with the Alabama Taxpayers' Bill of Rights and Uniform Revenue
127 Procedures Act under Chapter 2A, Title 41, Code of Alabama
128 1975.
129 (d) The Department of Revenue may adopt rules,
130 including rules requiring proof of renovation of an eligible
131 property, to administer this section.
132 Section 8. This act shall become effective on January
133 1, 2027.
Page 5